Hawaii statutes.
[§342D-92] Trustee; designation; duties. The
director may designate a trustee for each issue of revenue bonds secured under
the same indenture; provided that the trustee may be approved by the director
of finance. The trustee may have any duties and functions authorized by part
III of chapter 39, as deemed necessary, advisable, or expedient by the director
for the purposes of this part. [L 1997, c 221, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next